Hawaii, session 2026, SB2870.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 369-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1. By amending subsection (b) to read: "(b)  The commission shall consist of the following: (1)  Six ex officio, nonvoting members or their designees, including the: (A)  Superintendent of education; (B)  President of the University of Hawaii system; (C)  Director of labor and industrial relations; (D)  Director of human resources development; (E)  Director of human services; and (F)  Director of health; and (2)  [Eight] Nine voting members who shall be appointed by the governor in accordance with section 26-34; provided that of these [eight] Nine members: (A)  One member shall be from the county of Hawaii; (B)  One member shall be from the county of Kauai; (C)  One member shall be from the county of Maui; (D)  Four members shall be from the city and county of Honolulu; [and] (E)  One member shall represent the Hawaii sexual and gender minority workgroup of the department of health[.]; and (F)  One member shall be under the age of twenty-nine at the time of their appointment; and (3)  Two voting members, one of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one of whom shall be appointed by the senate president." 2. By amending subsection (d) to read: "(d)  A chairperson of the commission shall be elected annually from the [eight] eleven appointed members of the commission.  A quorum to do business or validate any act of the commission shall consist of a majority of the [eight] eleven appointed members of the commission." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________